District of Columbia statutes.
29-313.02

Inspection of records by shareholders.

(a)

A shareholder of a corporation shall be entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the corporation’s principal office, any of the records of the corporation described in § 29-313.01(e) if the shareholder gives the corporation notice in a record of the shareholder’s demand at least 5 business days before the date on which the shareholder wishes to inspect and copy.

(b)

A shareholder of a corporation shall be entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at a reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation if the shareholder meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section and gives the corporation notice in a record of the shareholder’s demand at least 5 business days before the date on which the shareholder wishes to inspect and copy:

(1)

Excerpts from minutes of any meeting of the board of directors, records of any action of a committee of the board of directors while acting in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation, minutes of any meeting of the shareholders, and records of action taken by the shareholders or board of directors without a meeting, to the extent not subject to inspection under § 29-313.02(a);

(2)

Accounting records of the corporation; and

(3)

The record of shareholders.

(c)

A shareholder may inspect and copy the records described in subsection (b) of this section only if:

(1)

The shareholder’s demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

(2)

The shareholder describes with reasonable particularity the shareholder’s purpose and the records the shareholder desires to inspect; and

(3)

The records are directly connected with the shareholder’s purpose.

(d)

The right of inspection granted by this section shall not be abolished or limited by a corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(e)

This section shall not affect:

(1)

The right of a shareholder to inspect records under § 29-305.20 or, if the shareholder is in litigation with the corporation, to the same extent as any other litigant; or

(2)

The power of the Superior Court, independently of this chapter, to compel the production of corporate records for examination.

(f)

For purposes of this section, the term “shareholder” includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the shareholder’s behalf.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(c)(34), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-305.20, § 29-313.03, and § 29-313.04.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “notice in a record” for “written notice” in (a) and (b).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.